Wyoming, session 2025, HB0105.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 41-3-314(a) and by creating a new
subsection (d) is amended to read:

41-3-314. Alterations or repairs of dams or diversion
systems; emergency repairs or breaching.

HB0105

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0402
(a) Subject to subsection (d) of this section, in
case of an emergency where the state engineer or his
authorized representative declares that repairs or
breaching of a dam or diversion system are immediately
necessary to safeguard life and property, the necessary
repairs or breaching shall be started immediately by the
owner or by the state engineer or his representative at the
owner's expense, if the owner fails to do so. The state
engineer and emergency response agencies shall be notified
at once of any changes in the physical conditions of the
dam, diversion system, or reservoir which significantly
increase the probability of failure of the dam or diversion
works or the danger to life or property, proposed emergency
repairs or breaching to be instituted by the owner. These
reporting requirements shall apply only to cases in which
an emergency has been declared pursuant to this subsection.

(d) Unless there is an immediate danger where a
breach is necessary in less than ten (10) days, before the
state engineer or his authorized representative may
physically execute an order requiring a breach under this
section the state engineer or his representative shall:

HB0105

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0402
(i) Determine whether there are alternatives to
breaching;

(ii) Hold not less than one (1) public meeting
in the area where the breach will occur, that is not a
public meeting of an irrigation district, to allow for
public comment. This public meeting shall occur, even if it
is after the breach order has been issued;

(iii) Notify those affected of liability
associated with any damage or unforeseen circumstances
associated with breaching issued under an order by the
state engineer;

(iv) Contact each water rights holder or
landowner with water storage rights providing information
on the proposed breach and the upcoming public meeting.

Section 2. This act shall apply to all orders by the
state engineer to breach a dam or diversion issued on and
after the effective date of this act.

HB0105

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0402
Section 3. The state engineer shall promulgate any
rules necessary to implement this act.

Section 4. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0105